test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-saarf_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - šaarf â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     šaarf+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: šaarf
     šaarf+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: šaarf
     šaarf+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: šaarf
     šaarf+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: šaaʹrfe
     šaarf+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: šaarfâst
     šaarf+N+Sg+Com+Indef: šaarfin
     šaarf+N+Ess+Indef: šaarfân
     šaarf+N+Par+Indef: šaarfâd
     šaarf+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [šaarftaa, šaarftää]
     šaarf+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: šaarf
     šaarf+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: šaarfi
     šaarf+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: šaarfid
     šaarf+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: šaarfid
     šaarf+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: šaarfin
     šaarf+N+Pl+Com+Indef: šaarfivuiʹm
     šaarf+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [šaarfitaa, šaarfitää]
